Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.260

Legal costs and expenses to be borne by commission.

All legal costs and expenses that may be incurred in the collection of delinquent accounts owed this commission shall be borne by the commission; except as provided for otherwise in RCW 15.26.220.

[ 1969 c 129 s 26.]